District of Columbia statutes.
2-381.07

Civil investigative demands.

(a)

(1)

Whenever the Attorney General for the District of Columbia has reason to believe that any person may be in possession, custody, or control of any documentary material or information relevant to a false claims law investigation, the Attorney General for the District of Columbia may, in order to determine whether to commence a civil proceeding pursuant to this chapter, issue in writing and cause to be served upon such person a civil investigative demand requiring that such person do the following:

(A)

Produce documentary material relevant to the false claims law investigation for inspection and copying;

(B)

Answer in writing written interrogatories with respect to any documentary material or information relevant to the false claims law investigation;

(C)

Provide oral testimony concerning any documentary material or information relevant to the false claims law investigation; or

(D)

Furnish any combination of such material, answers, or testimony.

(2)

The Attorney General for the District of Columbia may delegate to the Principal Deputy Attorney General for the District of Columbia the authority, in his or her absence, to issue civil investigative demands pursuant to paragraph (1) of this subsection. The Attorney General for the District of Columbia may not issue a civil investigative demand in order to conduct, or assist in the conducting of, a criminal investigation.

(b)

(1)

Each civil investigative demand issued pursuant to subsection (a)(1) of this section shall state the nature of the conduct constituting the alleged violation of a false claims law which is under investigation, and the applicable provision of law alleged to have been violated.

(2)

If such demand is for the production of documentary material, the demand shall do the following:

(A)

Describe each class of documentary material to be produced with such definiteness and certainty as to permit such material to be fairly identified;

(B)

Prescribe a return date for each such class that will provide a reasonable period of time within which the material so demanded may be assembled and made available for inspection and copying; and

(C)

Identify the false claims law investigator to whom such material shall be made available.

(3)

If such demand is for answers to written interrogatories, the demand shall do the following:

(A)

Set forth with specificity the written interrogatories to be answered;

(B)

Prescribe dates at which time answers to written interrogatories shall be submitted; and

(C)

Identify the false claims law investigator to whom such answers shall be submitted.

(4)

If such demand is for the giving of oral testimony, the demand shall do the following:

(A)

Prescribe the date, time, and place at which oral testimony shall commence;

(B)

Identify a false claims law investigator who shall conduct the examination and the custodian to whom the transcript of such examination shall be submitted;

(C)

Specify that such attendance and testimony are necessary to conduct the investigation;

(D)

Notify the person receiving the demand of the right to be accompanied by an attorney and any other representative; and

(E)

Describe the general purpose for which the demand is being issued and the general nature of the testimony, including the primary areas of inquiry, which will be taken pursuant to the demand.

(5)

The date prescribed for the commencement of oral testimony pursuant to a civil investigative demand shall be a date that is not less than 7 days after the date on which the demand is received, unless the Attorney General for the District of Columbia determines that exceptional circumstances are present that warrant the commencement of such testimony within a shorter period of time.

(6)

The Attorney General for the District of Columbia shall not authorize, pursuant to subsection (a)(1) of this section, issuance of more than one civil investigative demand for oral testimony by the same person unless the person requests otherwise or unless the Attorney General for the District of Columbia, after investigation, notifies that person in writing that an additional demand for oral testimony is necessary.

(c)

A civil investigative demand may not require the production of any documentary material, the submission of any answers to written interrogatories, or the giving of any oral testimony if such material, answers, or testimony would be protected from disclosure under:

(1)

The standards applicable to subpoenas or subpoenas duces tecum issued by a court of the District of Columbia to aid in a grand jury investigation; or

(2)

The standards applicable to discovery requests pursuant to the Superior Court Civil Rules to the extent that the application of such standards to any such demand is appropriate and consistent with the provisions and purposes of this section.

(d)

(1)

Any civil investigative demand issued pursuant to subsection (a) of this section may be served by a false claims law investigator or his or her agent, or by a United States marshal or a deputy marshal, at any place within the territorial jurisdiction of any court of the United States; provided, that the Superior Court of the District of Columbia could exercise jurisdiction over the recipient of the demand consistent with the due process clause of the Constitution of the United States.

(2)

Any such demand or any petition filed pursuant to subsection (a) of this section may be served upon any person who is not found within the territorial jurisdiction of any court of the United States in such manner as the Superior Court Civil Rules prescribe for service in a foreign country; provided, that the Superior Court of the District of Columbia could exercise jurisdiction over the recipient of the demand consistent with the due process clause of the Constitution of the United States.

(e)

(1)

Service of any civil investigative demand issued pursuant to subsection (a) of this section, or of any petition filed pursuant to subsection (a) of this section, may be made upon a partnership, corporation, association, or other legal entity by the following methods:

(A)

Delivering an executed copy of such demand or petition to any partner, executive officer, managing agent, or general agent of the partnership, corporation, association, or entity, or to any agent authorized by appointment or by law to receive service of process on behalf of such partnership, corporation, association, or entity;

(B)

Delivering an executed copy of such demand or petition to the principal office or place of business of the partnership, corporation, association, or entity; or

(C)

Depositing an executed copy of such demand or petition in the United States mail by registered or certified mail, with a return receipt requested, addressed to such partnership, corporation, association, or entity at its principal office or place of business.

(2)

Service of any such demand or petition may be made upon any natural person by the following methods:

(A)

Delivering an executed copy of such demand or petition to the person; or

(B)

Depositing an executed copy of such demand or petition in the United States mail by registered or certified mail, with a return receipt requested, addressed to the person at the person’s residence or principal office or place of business.

(f)

A verified return by the individual serving any civil investigative demand or any petition filed pursuant to subsection (a) of this section setting forth the manner of such service shall be proof of such service. In the case of service by registered or certified mail, such return shall be accompanied by the return post office receipt of delivery of such demand.

(g)

(1)

The production of documentary material in response to a civil investigative demand shall be made under a sworn certificate, in such form as the demand designates, by the following:

(A)

In the case of a natural person, by the person to whom the demand is directed; or

(B)

In the case of a person other than a natural person, by a person having knowledge of the facts and circumstances relating to such production and authorized to act on behalf of such person.

(2)

The certificate shall state that all of the documentary material required by the demand and in the possession, custody, or control of the person to whom the demand is directed has been produced and made available to the false claims law investigator identified in the demand.

(3)

Any person upon whom any civil investigative demand for the production of documentary material has been served shall make such material available for inspection and copying to the false claims law investigator identified in such demand at the principal place of business of such person, or at such other place as the false claims law investigator and the person thereafter may agree and prescribe in writing, or as the court may direct pursuant to subsection (j)(1) of this section. Such material shall be made so available on the return date specified in such demand, or on such later date as the false claims law investigator may prescribe in writing. Such person may, upon written agreement between the person and the false claims law investigator, substitute copies for originals of all or any part of such material.

(h)

(1)

Each interrogatory in a civil investigative demand shall be answered separately and fully in writing under oath and shall be submitted under a sworn certificate, in such form as the demand designates, as follows:

(A)

In the case of a natural person, by the person to whom the demand is directed, or

(B)

In the case of a person other than a natural person, by the person or persons responsible for answering each interrogatory.

(2)

If any interrogatory is objected to, the reasons for the objection shall be stated in the certificate instead of an answer. The certificate shall state that all information required by the demand and in the possession, custody, control, or knowledge of the person to whom the demand is directed has been submitted. To the extent that any information is not furnished, the information shall be identified and reasons set forth with particularity regarding the reasons why the information was not furnished.

(i)

(1)

The examination of any person, pursuant to a civil investigative demand for oral testimony, shall be conducted before an officer authorized to administer oaths and affirmations by the laws of the United States or of the place where the examination is held. The officer before whom the testimony is taken shall put the witness under oath or affirmation and shall, personally or by someone acting under the direction of the officer and in the officer’s presence, record the testimony of the witness. The testimony shall be taken by any means authorized by, and in a manner consistent with, the Superior Court Civil Rules, and shall be transcribed.

(2)

The false claims law investigator conducting the examination shall exclude from the place where the examination is held all persons except the person giving the testimony, the attorney or other representative of the person giving the testimony, the attorney for the District government, any person who may be agreed upon by the attorney for the District government and the person giving the testimony, the officer before whom the testimony is to be taken, and any stenographer taking such testimony.

(3)

The oral testimony of any person taken pursuant to a civil investigative demand shall be taken in the judicial district of the United States within which such person resides, is found, or transacts business, or in such other place as may be agreed upon by the false claims law investigator conducting the examination and such person.

(4)

When the testimony is fully transcribed, the false claims law investigator or the officer before whom the testimony is taken shall afford the witness, who may be accompanied by an attorney, a reasonable opportunity to examine and read the transcript, unless such examination and reading are waived by the witness. Any changes in form or substance that the witness desires shall be entered and identified upon the transcript by the officer or the false claims law investigator, with a statement of the reasons given by the witness for making such changes. The transcript shall then be signed by the witness, unless the witness in writing waives the signing, is ill, cannot be found, or refuses to sign. If the transcript is not signed by the witness within 30 days after being afforded a reasonable opportunity to examine it, the officer or the false claims law investigator shall sign it and state on the record the fact of the waiver, illness, absence of the witness, or the refusal to sign, together with the reasons, if any, given therefor.

(5)

The officer before whom the testimony is taken shall certify on the transcript that the witness was sworn by the officer and that the transcript is a true record of the testimony given by the witness. The officer or false claims law investigator shall promptly deliver the transcript, or send the transcript by registered or certified mail, to the custodian.

(6)

Upon payment of reasonable charges therefor, the false claims law investigator shall furnish a copy of the transcript to the witness only, except that the Attorney General for the District of Columbia may, for good cause, limit such witness to inspection of the official transcript of the witness’s testimony.

(7)

Any person compelled to appear for oral testimony pursuant to a civil investigative demand may be accompanied, represented, and advised by an attorney. The attorney may advise such person, in confidence, with respect to any question asked of such person. Such person or attorney may object on the record to any question, in whole or in part, and shall briefly state for the record the reason for the objection. An objection may be made, received, and entered upon the record only when it is claimed that such person is entitled to refuse to answer the question on the grounds of any constitutional or other legal right or privilege, including the privilege against self-incrimination. Such person may not otherwise object to or refuse to answer any question, and may not, directly or through the person’s attorney, otherwise interrupt the oral examination. If such person refuses to answer any question, a petition may be filed in the Superior Court of the District of Columbia pursuant to subsection (d)(1) of this section for an order compelling such person to answer the question.

(8)

Any person appearing for oral testimony pursuant to a civil investigative demand shall be entitled to the same fees and allowances that are paid to witnesses in the Superior Court of the District of Columbia.

(j)

(1)

The Attorney General for the District of Columbia shall designate a false claims law investigator to serve as custodian of documentary material, answers to interrogatories, and transcripts of oral testimony received pursuant to this section, and shall designate such additional false claims law investigators as the Attorney General for the District of Columbia determines from time to time to be necessary to serve as deputies to the custodian.

(2)

(A)

A false claims law investigator who receives any documentary material, answers to interrogatories, or transcripts of oral testimony pursuant to this section shall transmit them to the custodian. The custodian shall take physical possession of such material, answers, or transcripts and shall be responsible for the use made of them and for the return of documentary material pursuant to paragraph (4) of this subsection.

(B)

The custodian may cause the preparation of such copies of such documentary material, answers to interrogatories, or transcripts of oral testimony as may be required for official use by any false claims law investigator, or any other officer or employee of the Office of the Attorney General for the District of Columbia who is authorized for such use by the Attorney General for the District of Columbia. Such material, answers, and transcripts may be used by any authorized false claims law investigator or other officer or employee in connection with the taking of oral testimony pursuant to this section.

(C)

Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, no documentary material, answers to interrogatories, or transcripts of oral testimony, or copies thereof, while in the possession of the custodian, shall be available for examination by any individual other than a false claims law investigator or officer or employee of the Office of the Attorney General for the District of Columbia authorized pursuant to subparagraph (B) of this paragraph; provided that nothing in this subparagraph is intended to prevent:

(i)

The availability of material, answers, or transcripts if consent is given by the person who produced such material, answers, or transcripts;

(ii)

Disclosure to the Council, including any committee of the Council;

(iii)

Disclosure to the United States Attorney’s Office;

(iv)

Disclosure to any other federal or state agency for use by such agency in furtherance of its statutory responsibilities; provided, that disclosure of information to any agency other than the Council or the United States Attorney’s Office shall be allowed only upon application, made by the Attorney General for the District of Columbia to the Superior Court of the District of Columbia, showing substantial need for the use of the information by such agency in furtherance of its statutory responsibilities and after giving the individuals who provided the information an opportunity to be heard on the release of the information; or

(v)

Disclosure to any federal or state agency in connection with a joint case or investigation with the Office of the Attorney General for the District of Columbia provided that before disclosure, an official of the receiving agency agrees in writing to abide by the disclosure restrictions of this paragraph.

(D)

While in the possession of the custodian and under such reasonable terms and conditions as the Attorney General for the District of Columbia shall prescribe, the following shall apply:

(i)

Documentary material and answers to interrogatories shall be available for examination by the person who produced such material or answers, or by a representative of that person authorized by that person to examine such material and answers; and

(ii)

Transcripts of oral testimony shall be available for examination by the person who produced such testimony, or by a representative of that person authorized by that person to examine such transcripts.

(3)

Whenever any attorney of the Office of the Attorney General for the District of Columbia is conducting any official investigation or proceeding, the custodian of any documentary material, answers to interrogatories, or transcripts of oral testimony received pursuant to this section may deliver to such attorney such material, answers, or transcripts for official use in connection with any such investigation or proceeding as such attorney determines to be required. Upon the completion of any such investigation or proceeding, such attorney shall return to the custodian any such material, answers, or transcripts so delivered that have not passed into the control of any court or agency through introduction into the record of any case or proceeding.

(4)

If any documentary material has been produced by any person in the course of any false claims law investigation pursuant to a civil investigative demand, and any case or proceeding before a court arising out of such investigation, or any proceeding before any District government agency involving such material, has been completed, or no case or proceeding in which such material may be used has been commenced within a reasonable time after completion of the examination and analysis of all documentary material and other information assembled in the course of such investigation, the custodian shall, upon written request of the person who produced such material, return to such person any such material (other than copies furnished to the false claims law investigator pursuant to subsection (g)(2) of this section or made for the Office of the Attorney General for the District of Columbia pursuant to paragraph (2)(B) of this subsection), which has not passed into the control of any court or agency through introduction into the record of such case or proceeding.

(5)

(A)

In the event of the death, disability, or separation from service in the Office of the Attorney General for the District of Columbia of the custodian of any documentary material, answers to interrogatories, or transcripts of oral testimony produced pursuant to a civil investigative demand issued pursuant to this section, or in the event of the official relief of such custodian from responsibility for the custody and control of such material, answers, or transcripts, the Attorney General for the District of Columbia shall promptly do the following:

(i)

Designate another false claims law investigator to serve as custodian of such material, answers, or transcripts; and

(ii)

Transmit in writing to the person who produced such material, answers, or testimony notice of the identity and address of the successor so designated.

(B)

Any person who is designated to be a successor pursuant to this paragraph shall have, with regard to such material, answers, or transcripts, the same duties and responsibilities as were imposed by this section upon that person’s predecessor in office, except that the successor shall not be held responsible for any default or dereliction that occurred before that designation.

(k)

(1)

Whenever any person fails to comply with any civil investigative demand, or whenever satisfactory copying or reproduction of any material requested in such demand cannot be done and such person refuses to surrender such material, the Attorney General for the District of Columbia may file in the Superior Court of the District of Columbia and serve upon such person a petition for an order of such court for the enforcement of the civil investigative demand.

(2)

(A)

Any person who receives a civil investigative demand may file in the Superior Court of the District of Columbia and serve upon the false claims law investigator identified in such demand a petition for an order of the court to modify or set aside such demand. Any petition issued pursuant to this subparagraph must be filed:

(i)

Within 20 days after the date of service of the civil investigative demand, or at any time before the return date specified in the demand, whichever date is earlier; or

(ii)

Within such longer period as may be prescribed in writing by any false claims law investigator identified in the demand.

(B)

The petition shall specify each ground upon which the petitioner relies in seeking relief pursuant to subparagraph (A) of this paragraph, and may be based upon any failure of the demand, or any particular portion thereof, to comply with the provisions of this section or upon any constitutional or other legal right or privilege of such person. During the pendency of the petition in the court, the court may stay, as it deems proper, the running of the time allowed for compliance with the demand, in whole or in part, except that the person filing the petition shall comply with any portions of the demand not sought to be modified or set aside.

(3)

At any time during which any custodian is in custody or control of any documentary material or answers to interrogatories produced, or transcripts of oral testimony given, by any person in compliance with any civil investigative demand, such person may file in the Superior Court of the District of Columbia and serve upon such custodian, a petition for an order of such court to require the performance by the custodian of any duty imposed upon the custodian by this section.

(4)

Whenever any petition is filed in the Superior Court of the District of Columbia, such court shall have jurisdiction to hear and determine the matter so presented, and to enter such order or orders as may be required to carry out the provisions of this section. Any final order so entered shall be subject to appeal. Any disobedience of any final order entered pursuant to this section by any court shall be punished as contempt of court.

(5)

The Superior Court Civil Rules shall apply to any petition issued pursuant to this subsection, to the extent that such rules are not inconsistent with the provisions of this section.

(l)

Any documentary material, answers to written interrogatories, or oral testimony provided pursuant to any civil investigative demand issued pursuant to subsection (a) of this section shall be exempt from disclosure pursuant to subchapter II of Chapter 5 of this title.

(m)

For the purposes of this section, the term “person” means any natural person, partnership, corporation, association, or other legal entity, including any state or political subdivision of a state.

History

Feb. 21, 1986, D.C. Law 6-85, § 819, 32 DCR 7396
as added May 8, 1998, D.C. Law 12-104, § 2(g), 45 DCR 1687
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-264, § 10(e), 46 DCR 2118
Apr. 12, 2000, D.C. Law 13-91, § 122, 47 DCR 520
Mar. 19, 2013, D.C. Law 19-232, § 2(f), 59 DCR 13632

Section References

This section is referenced in § 2-308.19 and § 2-381.01.

Prior Codifications

2001 Ed., § 2-308.19.
1981 Ed., § 1-1188.19.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 13-91, in par. (4) of subsec. (j), substituted “subsection (g)(2)” for “subsection (e)(2)” and “paragraph (2)(B) of this subsection),” for “paragraph (2)(B) of this subsection,”.
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-232 substituted “Attorney General for the District of Columbia” for “Corporation Counsel” throughout the section; rewrote (j)(2)(C); and rewrote (m).